Illinois, session 104th, HB4078.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-12020 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-12020)7    Sec. 5-12020. Wind farms, electric-generating wind 8devices, and commercial Commercial wind energy facilities and 9commercial solar energy facilities. 10    (a) As used in this Section:11    "Commercial solar energy facility" means a "commercial 12solar energy system" as defined in Section 10-720 of the 13Property Tax Code. "Commercial solar energy facility" does not 14mean a utility-scale solar energy facility being constructed 15at a site that was eligible to participate in a procurement 16event conducted by the Illinois Power Agency pursuant to 17subsection (c-5) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency 18Act. 19    "Commercial wind energy facility" means a wind energy 20conversion facility of equal or greater than 500 kilowatts in 21total nameplate generating capacity. "Commercial wind energy 22facility" includes a wind energy conversion facility seeking 23an extension of a permit to construct granted by a county or   HB4078- 2 -LRB104 14335 WRO 27468 b1municipality before January 27, 2023 (the effective date of 2Public Act 102-1123).3    "Facility owner" means (i) a person with a direct 4ownership interest in a commercial wind energy facility or a 5commercial solar energy facility, or both, regardless of 6whether the person is involved in acquiring the necessary 7rights, permits, and approvals or otherwise planning for the 8construction and operation of the facility, and (ii) at the 9time the facility is being developed, a person who is acting as 10a developer of the facility by acquiring the necessary rights, 11permits, and approvals or by planning for the construction and 12operation of the facility, regardless of whether the person 13will own or operate the facility.14    "Nonparticipating property" means real property that is 15not a participating property.16    "Nonparticipating residence" means a residence that is 17located on nonparticipating property and that is existing and 18occupied on the date that an application for a permit to 19develop the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial 20solar energy facility is filed with the county.21    "Occupied community building" means any one or more of the 22following buildings that is existing and occupied on the date 23that the application for a permit to develop the commercial 24wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 25is filed with the county: a school, place of worship, day care 26facility, public library, or community center.  HB4078- 3 -LRB104 14335 WRO 27468 b1    "Participating property" means real property that is the 2subject of a written agreement between a facility owner and 3the owner of the real property that provides the facility 4owner an easement, option, lease, or license to use the real 5property for the purpose of constructing a commercial wind 6energy facility, a commercial solar energy facility, or 7supporting facilities. "Participating property" also includes 8real property that is owned by a facility owner for the purpose 9of constructing a commercial wind energy facility, a 10commercial solar energy facility, or supporting facilities.11    "Participating residence" means a residence that is 12located on participating property and that is existing and 13occupied on the date that an application for a permit to 14develop the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial 15solar energy facility is filed with the county.16    "Protected lands" means real property that is: 17        (1) subject to a permanent conservation right 18    consistent with the Real Property Conservation Rights Act; 19    or 20        (2) registered or designated as a nature preserve, 21    buffer, or land and water reserve under the Illinois 22    Natural Areas Preservation Act. 23    "Supporting facilities" means the transmission lines, 24substations, access roads, meteorological towers, storage 25containers, and equipment associated with the generation and 26storage of electricity by the commercial wind energy facility   HB4078- 4 -LRB104 14335 WRO 27468 b1or commercial solar energy facility.2    "Wind tower" includes the wind turbine tower, nacelle, and 3blades. 4    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or whether 5the county has formed a zoning commission and adopted formal 6zoning under Section 5-12007, a county may establish standards 7for wind farms and electric-generating wind devices commercial 8wind energy facilities, commercial solar energy facilities, or 9both. The standards may include, without limitation, the 10height of the devices and the number of devices that may be 11located within a geographic area all of the requirements 12specified in this Section but may not include requirements for 13commercial wind energy facilities or commercial solar energy 14facilities that are more restrictive than specified in this 15Section. A county may also regulate the siting of wind farms 16and electric-generating wind devices commercial wind energy 17facilities with standards that are not more restrictive than 18the requirements specified in this Section in unincorporated 19areas of the county that are outside the zoning jurisdiction 20of a municipality and that are outside the 1.5-mile radius 21surrounding the zoning jurisdiction of a municipality. 22    (c) If a county has elected to establish standards under 23subsection (b), before the county grants siting approval or a 24special use permit for a commercial wind energy facility or a 25commercial solar energy facility, or modification of an 26approved siting or special use permit, the county board of the   HB4078- 5 -LRB104 14335 WRO 27468 b1county in which the facility is to be sited or the zoning board 2of appeals for the county shall hold at least one public 3hearing. The public hearing shall be conducted in accordance 4with the Open Meetings Act and shall be held not more than 60 5days after the filing of the application for the facility. The 6county shall allow interested parties to a special use permit 7an opportunity to present evidence and to cross-examine 8witnesses at the hearing, but the county may impose reasonable 9restrictions on the public hearing, including reasonable time 10limitations on the presentation of evidence and the 11cross-examination of witnesses. The county shall also allow 12public comment at the public hearing in accordance with the 13Open Meetings Act. The county shall make its siting and 14permitting decisions There shall be at least one public 15hearing not more than 30 days prior to a siting decision by the 16county board after the conclusion of the public hearing. 17Notice of the hearing shall be published in a newspaper of 18general circulation in the county. A commercial wind energy 19facility owner, as defined in the Renewable Energy Facilities 20Agricultural Impact Mitigation Act, must enter into an 21agricultural impact mitigation agreement with the Department 22of Agriculture prior to the date of the required public 23hearing. A commercial wind energy facility owner seeking an 24extension of a permit granted by a county prior to July 24, 252015 (the effective date of Public Act 99-132) must enter into 26an agricultural impact mitigation agreement with the   HB4078- 6 -LRB104 14335 WRO 27468 b1Department of Agriculture prior to a decision by the county to 2grant the permit extension. Counties may allow test wind 3towers or test solar energy systems to be sited without formal 4approval by the county board. Any provision of a county zoning 5ordinance pertaining to wind farms, commercial wind energy 6facilities, or commercial solar energy facilities that was in 7effect before January 27, 2023 may continue in effect 8notwithstanding any changes made in Public Act 102-1123 and, 9if applicable, any provision of a county zoning ordinance 10pertaining to wind farms that was in effect before August 16, 112007 may continue in effect notwithstanding the changes made 12in Public Act 95-203. 13    (d) A county with an existing zoning ordinance in conflict 14with this Section shall amend that zoning ordinance to be in 15compliance with this Section within 120 days after January 27, 162023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1123).17    (e) A county may not require a wind tower or other 18renewable energy system that is used exclusively by an end 19user to be setback more than 1.1 times the height of the 20renewable energy system from the end user's property line. : 21        (1) a wind tower of a commercial wind energy facility 22    to be sited as follows, with setback distances measured 23    from the center of the base of the wind tower:  24Setback Description           Setback Distance   HB4078- 7 -LRB104 14335 WRO 27468 b1Occupied Community            2.1 times the maximum blade tip2Buildings                     height of the wind tower to the3                              nearest point on the outside4                              wall of the structure 5Participating Residences      1.1 times the maximum blade tip6                              height of the wind tower to the7                              nearest point on the outside8                              wall of the structure 9Nonparticipating Residences   2.1 times the maximum blade tip10                              height of the wind tower to the11                              nearest point on the outside12                              wall of the structure 13Boundary Lines of             None14Participating Property  15Boundary Lines of             1.1 times the maximum blade tip16Nonparticipating Property     height of the wind tower to the17                              nearest point on the property18                              line of the nonparticipating19                              property 20Public Road Rights-of-Way     1.1 times the maximum blade tip21                              height of the wind tower  HB4078- 8 -LRB104 14335 WRO 27468 b1                              to the center point of the2                              public road right-of-way 3Overhead Communication and    1.1 times the maximum blade tip4Electric Transmission         height of the wind tower to the5and Distribution Facilities   nearest edge of the property6(Not Including Overhead       line, easement, or 7Utility Service Lines to      right-of-way 8Individual Houses or          containing the overhead line9Outbuildings) 10Overhead Utility Service      None11Lines to Individual12Houses or Outbuildings 13Fish and Wildlife Areas       2.1 times the maximum blade14and Illinois Nature           tip height of the wind tower15Preserve Commission           to the nearest point on the16Protected Lands               property line of the fish and17                              wildlife area or protected18                              land19    This Section does not exempt or excuse compliance with 20    electric facility clearances approved or required by the 21    National Electrical Code, The National Electrical Safety 22    Code, Illinois Commerce Commission, Federal Energy 23    Regulatory Commission, and their designees or successors.   HB4078- 9 -LRB104 14335 WRO 27468 b1        (2) a wind tower of a commercial wind energy facility 2    to be sited so that industry standard computer modeling 3    indicates that any occupied community building or 4    nonparticipating residence will not experience more than 5    30 hours per year of shadow flicker under planned 6    operating conditions;7        (3) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited as 8    follows, with setback distances measured from the nearest 9    edge of any component of the facility:  10Setback Description           Setback Distance 11Occupied Community            150 feet from the nearest12Buildings and Dwellings on    point on the outside wall 13Nonparticipating Properties   of the structure 14Boundary Lines of             None15Participating Property     16Public Road Rights-of-Way     50 feet from the nearest17                              edge 18Boundary Lines of             50 feet to the nearest19Nonparticipating Property     point on the property20                              line of the nonparticipating21                              property   HB4078- 10 -LRB104 14335 WRO 27468 b1        (4) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited so 2    that the facility's perimeter is enclosed by fencing 3    having a height of at least 6 feet and no more than 25 4    feet; and 5        (5) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited so 6    that no component of a solar panel has a height of more 7    than 20 feet above ground when the solar energy facility's 8    arrays are at full tilt. 9    The requirements set forth in this subsection (e) may be 10waived subject to the written consent of the owner of each 11affected nonparticipating property.12    (f) A county may not set a sound limitation for wind towers 13in commercial wind energy facilities or any components in 14commercial solar energy facilities that is more restrictive 15than the sound limitations established by the Illinois 16Pollution Control Board under 35 Ill. Adm. Code Parts 900, 17901, and 910.18    (g) A county may not place any restriction on the 19installation or use of a commercial wind energy facility or a 20commercial solar energy facility unless it adopts an ordinance 21that complies with this Section. A county may not establish 22siting standards for supporting facilities that preclude 23development of commercial wind energy facilities or commercial 24solar energy facilities. 25    A request for siting approval or a special use permit for a   HB4078- 11 -LRB104 14335 WRO 27468 b1commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 2facility, or modification of an approved siting or special use 3permit, shall be approved if the request is in compliance with 4the standards and conditions imposed in this Act, the zoning 5ordinance adopted consistent with this Code, and the 6conditions imposed under State and federal statutes and 7regulations. 8    (h) A county may not adopt zoning regulations that 9disallow, permanently or temporarily, commercial wind energy 10facilities or commercial solar energy facilities from being 11developed or operated in any district zoned to allow 12agricultural or industrial uses. 13    (i) A county may not require permit application fees for a 14commercial wind energy facility or commercial solar energy 15facility that are unreasonable. All application fees imposed 16by the county shall be consistent with fees for projects in the 17county with similar capital value and cost. 18    (j) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, a county 19shall not require standards for construction, decommissioning, 20or deconstruction of a commercial wind energy facility or 21commercial solar energy facility or related financial 22assurances that are more restrictive than those included in 23the Department of Agriculture's standard wind farm 24agricultural impact mitigation agreement, template 81818, or 25standard solar agricultural impact mitigation agreement, 26version 8.19.19, as applicable and in effect on December 31,   HB4078- 12 -LRB104 14335 WRO 27468 b12022. The amount of any decommissioning payment shall be in 2accordance with the financial assurance required by those 3agricultural impact mitigation agreements. 4    (j-5) A commercial wind energy facility or a commercial 5solar energy facility shall file a farmland drainage plan with 6the county and impacted drainage districts outlining how 7surface and subsurface drainage of farmland will be restored 8during and following construction or deconstruction of the 9facility. The plan is to be created independently by the 10facility developer and shall include the location of any 11potentially impacted drainage district facilities to the 12extent this information is publicly available from the county 13or the drainage district, plans to repair any subsurface 14drainage affected during construction or deconstruction using 15procedures outlined in the agricultural impact mitigation 16agreement entered into by the commercial wind energy facility 17owner or commercial solar energy facility owner, and 18procedures for the repair and restoration of surface drainage 19affected during construction or deconstruction. All surface 20and subsurface damage shall be repaired as soon as reasonably 21practicable. 22    (k) A county may not condition approval of a commercial 23wind energy facility or commercial solar energy facility on a 24property value guarantee and may not require a facility owner 25to pay into a neighboring property devaluation escrow account. 26    (l) A county may require certain vegetative screening   HB4078- 13 -LRB104 14335 WRO 27468 b1surrounding a commercial wind energy facility or commercial 2solar energy facility but may not require earthen berms or 3similar structures. 4    (m) A county may set blade tip height limitations for wind 5towers in commercial wind energy facilities but may not set a 6blade tip height limitation that is more restrictive than the 7height allowed under a Determination of No Hazard to Air 8Navigation by the Federal Aviation Administration under 14 CFR 9Part 77.10    (n) A county may require that a commercial wind energy 11facility owner or commercial solar energy facility owner 12provide:13        (1) the results and recommendations from consultation 14    with the Illinois Department of Natural Resources that are 15    obtained through the Ecological Compliance Assessment Tool 16    (EcoCAT) or a comparable successor tool; and17        (2) the results of the United States Fish and Wildlife 18    Service's Information for Planning and Consulting 19    environmental review or a comparable successor tool that 20    is consistent with (i) the "U.S. Fish and Wildlife 21    Service's Land-Based Wind Energy Guidelines" and (ii) any 22    applicable United States Fish and Wildlife Service solar 23    wildlife guidelines that have been subject to public 24    review. 25    Only a county may establish standards for wind farms, 26electric-generating wind devices, and commercial wind energy   HB4078- 14 -LRB104 14335 WRO 27468 b1facilities, as that term is defined in Section 10 of the 2Renewable Energy Facilities Agricultural Impact Mitigation 3Act, in unincorporated areas of the county outside of the 4zoning jurisdiction of a municipality and outside the 1.5-mile 5radius surrounding the zoning jurisdiction of a municipality. 6    (o) A county may require a commercial wind energy facility 7or commercial solar energy facility to adhere to the 8recommendations provided by the Illinois Department of Natural 9Resources in an EcoCAT natural resource review report under 17 10Ill. Adm. Code Part 1075. 11    (p) A county may require a facility owner to:12        (1) demonstrate avoidance of protected lands as 13    identified by the Illinois Department of Natural Resources 14    and the Illinois Nature Preserve Commission; or15        (2) consider the recommendations of the Illinois 16    Department of Natural Resources for setbacks from 17    protected lands, including areas identified by the 18    Illinois Nature Preserve Commission.19    (q) A county may require that a facility owner provide 20evidence of consultation with the Illinois State Historic 21Preservation Office to assess potential impacts on 22State-registered historic sites under the Illinois State 23Agency Historic Resources Preservation Act. 24    (r) To maximize community benefits, including, but not 25limited to, reduced stormwater runoff, flooding, and erosion 26at the ground mounted solar energy system, improved soil   HB4078- 15 -LRB104 14335 WRO 27468 b1health, and increased foraging habitat for game birds, 2songbirds, and pollinators, a county may (1) require a 3commercial solar energy facility owner to plant, establish, 4and maintain for the life of the facility vegetative ground 5cover, consistent with the goals of the Pollinator-Friendly 6Solar Site Act and (2) require the submittal of a vegetation 7management plan that is in compliance with the agricultural 8impact mitigation agreement in the application to construct 9and operate a commercial solar energy facility in the county 10if the vegetative ground cover and vegetation management plan 11comply with the requirements of the underlying agreement with 12the landowner or landowners where the facility will be 13constructed. 14    No later than 90 days after January 27, 2023 (the 15effective date of Public Act 102-1123), the Illinois 16Department of Natural Resources shall develop guidelines for 17vegetation management plans that may be required under this 18subsection for commercial solar energy facilities. The 19guidelines must include guidance for short-term and long-term 20property management practices that provide and maintain native 21and non-invasive naturalized perennial vegetation to protect 22the health and well-being of pollinators. 23    (s) If a facility owner enters into a road use agreement 24with the Illinois Department of Transportation, a road 25district, or other unit of local government relating to a 26commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy   HB4078- 16 -LRB104 14335 WRO 27468 b1facility, the road use agreement shall require the facility 2owner to be responsible for (i) the reasonable cost of 3improving roads used by the facility owner to construct the 4commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy 5facility and (ii) the reasonable cost of repairing roads used 6by the facility owner during construction of the commercial 7wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 8so that those roads are in a condition that is safe for the 9driving public after the completion of the facility's 10construction. Roadways improved in preparation for and during 11the construction of the commercial wind energy facility or 12commercial solar energy facility shall be repaired and 13restored to the improved condition at the reasonable cost of 14the developer if the roadways have degraded or were damaged as 15a result of construction-related activities.16    The road use agreement shall not require the facility 17owner to pay costs, fees, or charges for road work that is not 18specifically and uniquely attributable to the construction of 19the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar 20energy facility. Road-related fees, permit fees, or other 21charges imposed by the Illinois Department of Transportation, 22a road district, or other unit of local government under a road 23use agreement with the facility owner shall be reasonably 24related to the cost of administration of the road use 25agreement. 26    (s-5) The facility owner shall also compensate landowners   HB4078- 17 -LRB104 14335 WRO 27468 b1for crop losses or other agricultural damages resulting from 2damage to the drainage system caused by the construction of 3the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar 4energy facility. The commercial wind energy facility owner or 5commercial solar energy facility owner shall repair or pay for 6the repair of all damage to the subsurface drainage system 7caused by the construction of the commercial wind energy 8facility or the commercial solar energy facility in accordance 9with the agriculture impact mitigation agreement requirements 10for repair of drainage. The commercial wind energy facility 11owner or commercial solar energy facility owner shall repair 12or pay for the repair and restoration of surface drainage 13caused by the construction or deconstruction of the commercial 14wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 15as soon as reasonably practicable. 16    (t) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a facility 17owner with siting approval from a county to construct a 18commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 19facility is authorized to cross or impact a drainage system, 20including, but not limited to, drainage tiles, open drainage 21ditches, culverts, and water gathering vaults, owned or under 22the control of a drainage district under the Illinois Drainage 23Code without obtaining prior agreement or approval from the 24drainage district in accordance with the farmland drainage 25plan required by subsection (j-5). 26    (u) The amendments to this Section adopted in Public Act   HB4078- 18 -LRB104 14335 WRO 27468 b1102-1123 do not apply to: (1) an application for siting 2approval or for a special use permit for a commercial wind 3energy facility or commercial solar energy facility if the 4application was submitted to a unit of local government before 5January 27, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1123); 6(2) a commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar 7energy facility if the facility owner has submitted an 8agricultural impact mitigation agreement to the Department of 9Agriculture before January 27, 2023 (the effective date of 10Public Act 102-1123); or (3) a commercial wind energy or 11commercial solar energy development on property that is 12located within an enterprise zone certified under the Illinois 13Enterprise Zone Act, that was classified as industrial by the 14appropriate zoning authority on or before January 27, 2023, 15and that is located within 4 miles of the intersection of 16Interstate 88 and Interstate 39. 17(Source: P.A. 102-1123, eff. 1-27-23; 103-81, eff. 6-9-23; 18103-580, eff. 12-8-23; revised 7-29-24.)